Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-239
Judges and clerks of election; district inspectors; vacancies; how filled.

All vacancies of judges and clerks of election appointed pursuant to section 32-230 and district inspectors appointed pursuant to subsection (2) of section 32-231 shall be filled as nearly as possible in the manner in which the original appointments were made. At least fifteen days prior to any election, the county clerk shall review the list of district inspectors and the list of judges and clerks of election in the precincts in which the election is to occur and fill any vacancies. When a district inspector or judge or clerk of election is a candidate for an office to be voted upon at the election, his or her position as a district inspector, judge, or clerk shall be vacant.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 59;

Laws 1999, LB 802, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 25.